Texas statutes.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 14. PARKING AND TRANSPORTATION

SUBTITLE B. COUNTY PARKING AND TRANSPORTATION PROVISIONS

CHAPTER 615. MISCELLANEOUS PARKING AND TRANSPORTATION PROVISIONS AFFECTING COUNTIES

SUBCHAPTER A. PARKING

Sec. 615.001. PARKING ON COUNTY PROPERTY. (a) The commissioners court of a county by order may regulate the parking of vehicles on property owned or leased by the county.

(b) The commissioners court may adopt rules under this section to:

(1) limit the use of parking spaces to certain vehicles or types of vehicles;

(2) limit the time that a vehicle may be parked in a specific space or area; or

(3) prohibit the parking of vehicles in certain areas.

(c) If a county restricts or prohibits parking in a place, it shall erect an appropriately worded sign at the place to inform a driver of a vehicle of the restriction or prohibition. The county is not required to erect a sign to indicate that parking is prohibited on a lawn or other area that does not appear to be a place intended for use as a parking area.

(d) A county may provide for towing and storing a vehicle at the owner's expense if it is parked in violation of a rule adopted under this section. The county may not provide for towing a vehicle that is parked under circumstances that create a defense to prosecution under Subsection (e).

(e) A person commits an offense if the person parks a vehicle in violation of a rule adopted under this section. An offense under this section is a Class C misdemeanor. It is a defense to prosecution under this section that the place where the person parked is an area in which a sign is required under Subsection (c) and that there was no sign in place at the time the person parked.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Renumbered from Local Government Code, Section 445.001 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 3.76(e)(1), eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 615.002. REGULATION OF COURTHOUSE PARKING LOTS IN CERTAIN COUNTIES.

(a) This section applies to a county with a population of:

(1) 14,800 to 15,000;

(2) 19,900 to 20,000;

(3) 21,300 to 21,500;

(4) 57,800 to 57,900;

(5) 36,000 to 36,500; or

(6) 234,000 or more.

(b) The commissioners court of the county may purchase necessary equipment and may make and enforce rules for parking in a county-owned or county-leased parking lot in, under, adjacent to, or near the county courthouse.

(c) The commissioners court and the governing body of the municipality in which the courthouse is located may contract for enforcement of the rules.

(d) The sheriff's department of the county may enforce the rules.

(e) A person commits an offense if the person violates a parking rule adopted under this section. An offense under this subsection is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than $1 nor more than $20.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 597, Sec. 105, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 669, Sec. 111, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Renumbered from Local Government Code, Section 445.002 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 3.76(e)(1), eff. April 1, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1163 (H.B. 2702), Sec. 103, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 644 (H.B. 4559), Sec. 201, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 615.003. PARKING LOTS AND PARKING GARAGES IN CERTAIN COUNTIES. (a) A county with a population of 150,000 or more may construct, enlarge, equip, and operate a parking lot or parking garage adjacent to or near the county courthouse.

(b) The county may lease the parking lot or parking garage to a person on terms considered appropriate by the commissioners court of the county.

(c) To exercise a power granted by this section, the commissioners court of the county may appropriate and spend money from the general fund or the permanent improvement fund of the county.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Renumbered from Local Government Code, Section 445.003 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 3.76(e)(1), eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 615.004. FREE PARKING IN COUNTY PARKING FACILITIES. (a) The commissioners court of a county by order may permit former prisoners of war or persons awarded the Purple Heart or a Congressional Medal of Honor to park free of charge in any county parking facility.

(b) The commissioners court of the county may adopt procedures to administer this section, including procedures to verify the status of a person described by Subsection (a).

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1049, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1999.

Renumbered from Local Government Code, Section 445.004 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 3.76(e)(1), eff. April 1, 2009.

SUBCHAPTER B. AIRPORTS

Sec. 615.011. USE OF EQUIPMENT ON AIRSTRIPS BY CERTAIN COUNTIES. (a) In this section, "airstrip" means:

(1) an area of land or water used or intended for use for the landing and takeoff of aircraft; and

(2) an appurtenant area used or intended for use for an airport building, other airport facility, or right-of-way.

(b) A county with a population of 44,500 to 45,500 may authorize the use of county equipment, machinery, and employees to construct, establish, and maintain a public airstrip in the county.

(c) The county shall pay the cost of the use of the county equipment, machinery, and employees from appropriate county funds.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 597, Sec. 106, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 669, Sec. 112, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Renumbered from Local Government Code, Section 445.011 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 3.76(e)(2), eff. April 1, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1163 (H.B. 2702), Sec. 104, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 644 (H.B. 4559), Sec. 202, eff. September 1, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER C. TRANSPORTATION

Sec. 615.021. GRANTS FOR TRANSPORTATION SERVICES. (a) A county may provide grants to an eligible nonprofit corporation that provides transportation services to residents of the county.

(b) An eligible nonprofit corporation is one that was organized before September 1, 1985, to coordinate the public transportation services of state agencies in a regional rural area and to provide public transportation in a county or multicounty rural area.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 679, Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 1991.

Renumbered from Local Government Code, Section 445.021 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 3.76(e)(3), eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 615.022. TRANSPORTATION EXPENSES OF CERTAIN COUNTIES FOR SENIOR CITIZENS. The commissioners court of a county with a population of 2.2 million or more may pay out of the county general funds costs and expenses for the transportation of senior citizens and their caregivers for civic, community, educational, and recreational activities within and outside the county if a majority of the costs and expenses paid are for the transportation of senior citizens.

Renumbered from Sec. 332.004(c) by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 8.02, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Renumbered from Local Government Code, Section 445.022 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 3.76(e)(3), eff. April 1, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 15.017, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1163 (H.B. 2702), Sec. 105, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 865 (H.B. 1929), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 615.023. CONTRACTS WITH TRANSIT AUTHORITIES. (a) The commissioners court of a county may contract with a rapid transit authority operating under Chapter 451, Transportation Code, or a metropolitan transportation authority operating under Chapter 452 of that code for the authority to provide public transportation services to an unincorporated area of the county outside the boundaries of the authority.

(b) The county may impose taxes and pledge and encumber other receipts and revenue as may be required to make payments to the authority under the contract.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 13, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Renumbered from Local Government Code, Section 445.023 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 3.76(e)(3), eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 615.024. REGULATION OF TRANSIT AUTHORITY PASSENGERS. (a) The commissioners court of a county in which there is located a rapid transit authority operating under Chapter 451, Transportation Code, the principal municipality of which has a population of more than 1.9 million, may adopt an ordinance of the principal municipality relating to the conduct of persons:

(1) on board a transit vehicle;

(2) awaiting transportation on a transit vehicle at a bus stop or other place designated as a place of entry to or exit from a transit vehicle;

(3) in a facility, including a building, storage unit, or parking lot of the rapid transit authority; or

(4) in a transit route or other dedicated traffic lane over which a transit vehicle travels and that is specifically labeled or numbered for the purpose of picking up or discharging passengers at regularly scheduled stops or intervals.

(b) An order adopted under this section applies in all parts of the county.

(c) An offense defined by an order under this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

(d) In this section:

(1) "Principal municipality" has the meaning assigned by Section 451.001, Transportation Code.

(2) "Transit vehicle" means a vehicle operated by a rapid transit authority operating under Chapter 451, Transportation Code.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 14, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 669, Sec. 113, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Renumbered from Local Government Code, Section 445.024 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 3.76(e)(3), eff. April 1, 2009.

SUBCHAPTER D. SPECIAL COUNTY ROAD ASSISTANCE PROGRAM

Sec. 615.101. SPECIAL COUNTY ROAD ASSISTANCE PROGRAM. On or before October 15 of each year, the comptroller shall distribute to counties money appropriated for the special county road assistance program under this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 943, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Renumbered from Local Government Code, Section 445.101 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 3.76(e)(4), eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 615.102. USE OF MONEY. Money appropriated to the program under this subchapter may be used only for the support of the county road system, including uses specified by Section 256.003, Transportation Code.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 943, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Renumbered from Local Government Code, Section 445.102 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 3.76(e)(4), eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 615.103. ALLOCATION FORMULA. The comptroller shall distribute money appropriated to the program under this subchapter among the counties as follows:

(1) two-fifths according to total population, determined by the ratio of the total population of the county to the total population of the state;

(2) one-fifth according to population, determined by the ratio of the population in unincorporated areas of the county to the population in all unincorporated areas of the state;

(3) one-fifth according to lineal county road miles, determined by the ratio of lineal mileage of county roads in the county to the lineal mileage of county roads in the state, according to the most recent county road inventory compiled by the Texas Department of Transportation; and

(4) one-fifth according to paved and concrete county road miles, determined by the ratio of miles of lanes of paved and concrete county roads in the county to the miles of lanes of paved and concrete county roads in the state, according to the most recent county road inventory compiled by the Texas Department of Transportation.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 943, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Renumbered from Local Government Code, Section 445.103 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 3.76(e)(4), eff. April 1, 2009.